District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.04

Organization.

(a)

The Department shall have sufficient staff, supervisory personnel, and resources to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(b)

The Director shall have the authority to organize the Department as the Director may determine is necessary and appropriate to carry out the Department’s mission.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 104, 54 DCR 818
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 104 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).